Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-162
Communication or contact agreement; authorized; approval.

The prospective adoptive parent or parents and the birth parent or parents of a prospective adoptee may enter into an agreement regarding communication or contact after the adoption between or among the prospective adoptee and his or her birth parent or parents if the prospective adoptee is in the custody of the Department of Health and Human Services. Any such agreement shall not be enforceable unless approved by the court pursuant to section 43-163.

Laws 1993, LB 205, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 124;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 17.